North Dakota statutes. TITLE 45 Partnerships
CHAPTER 45-10.2 Uniform Limited Partnership Act
45-10.2-13. (111)
Required information.

A limited partnership shall maintain at its principal executive office the following information:

A current list showing the full name and last-known street and mailing address of each partner, separately identifying the general partners, in alphabetical order, and the limited partners, in alphabetical order;

A copy of the initial certificate of limited partnership and all amendments to and restatements of the certificate, together with signed copies of any powers of attorney under which any certificate, amendment, or restatement has been signed;

A copy of any filed articles of conversion or merger;

A copy of the federal, state, and local income tax returns and reports of a limited partnership, if any, for the three most recent years;

A copy of any partnership agreement made in a record and any amendment made in a record to any partnership agreement;

A copy of any financial statement of the limited partnership for the three most recent years;

A copy of the three most recent annual reports delivered by the limited partnership to the secretary of state pursuant to section 45-10.2-108;

A copy of any record made by the limited partnership during the past three years of any consent given by or vote taken of any partner pursuant to this chapter or the partnership agreement; and

Unless contained in a partnership agreement made in a record, a record stating:

The amount of cash, and a description and statement of the agreed value of the other benefits, contributed and agreed to be contributed by each partner;

The times at which, or events on the happening of which, any additional contributions agreed to be made by each partner are to be made;

For any person that is both a general partner and a limited partner, a specification of what transferable interest the person owns in each capacity; and

Any events upon the happening of which the limited partnership is to be dissolved and its activities wound up.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-14. (112)
Business transactions of partner with partnership.

A partner may lend money to and transact other business with the limited partnership and has the same rights and obligations with respect to the loan or other transaction as a person that is not a partner.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-15. (113)
Dual capacity.

A person may be both a general partner and a limited partner.

A person that is both a general and limited partner has the rights, powers, duties, and obligations provided by this chapter and the partnership agreement in each of those capacities.

When the person acts as a general partner, the person is subject to the obligations, duties, and restrictions under this chapter and the partnership agreement for general partners.

When the person acts as a limited partner, the person is subject to the obligations, duties, and restrictions under this chapter and the partnership agreement for limited partners.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-16.
Registration of general partner.

A general partner must be registered separately with the secretary of state at the time of filing a certificate of limited partnership or the application for certificate of authority of a foreign limited partnership whenever that general partner is either a domestic or foreign:

Corporation;

Limited liability company;

Limited partnership;

Limited liability partnership;

Limited liability limited partnership;

General partnership; or

Any other organization that has a registration responsibility with the secretary of state.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-17.
Registered office — Registered agent.

A limited partnership shall continuously maintain a registered agent in this state as provided by chapter 10-01.1, and if a noncommercial registered agent, the address of that noncommercial registered agent.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2007, ch. 99, § 59.

45-10.2-18.
Change of registered office or agent — Resignation of registered agent — Change of name or address of registered agent.

A limited partnership may change its registered office, change its registered agent, or state a change in the name of the registered agent as provided in chapter 10-01.1.

A registered agent of a limited partnership may resign as provided in chapter 10-01.1.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2007, ch. 99, § 60.

45-10.2-19.
Action without a meeting.

An action required or permitted to be taken or permitted to be taken at a meeting of the partners may be taken without a meeting by written action signed, or consented to by authenticated electronic communication, by all of the partners entitled to vote on that action.

If the certificate of limited partnership or the partnership agreement so provides, any action may be taken by written action signed, or consented to by authenticated electronic communication, by the partners entitled to vote on the action who own voting power equal to the voting power that would be required to take the same action at a meeting of the partners at which all partners entitled to vote on the action were present. After the adoption of the initial certificate of limited partnership or the initial partnership agreement, an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership or to the partnership agreement to permit written action to be taken by less than all partners entitled to vote on an action requires the approval of all partners entitled to vote on the amendment.

When written action is permitted to be taken by less than all partners entitled to vote on the action, all partners entitled to vote on the action must be notified immediately of its text and effective date.

Failure to provide the notice does not invalidate the written action.

A partner who does not sign or consent to the written action has no liability for the action or actions taken by the written actions.

The written action is effective when it has been signed, or consented to by authenticated electronic communication, by the partners entitled to vote on the action, unless a different effective time is provided in the written action.

When this chapter requires or permits a certificate concerning an action to be filed with the secretary of state, the general partner signing the certificate must so indicate if the action was taken under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-20.
Remote communications for partner meetings.

This section must be construed and applied to:

Facilitate remote communication consistent with other applicable law; and

Be consistent with reasonable practices concerning remote communication and with the continued expansion of those practices.

To the extent authorized in the certificate of limited partnership or the partnership agreement and determined by the general partners:

A meeting of the partners may be held solely by any combination of means of remote communication through which the participants may participate in the meeting:

If notice of the meeting is given to every holder of interests entitled to vote as would be required by the certificate of limited partnership or the partnership agreement for a meeting; and

If the number of partnership interests held by the partners participating in the meeting would be sufficient to constitute a quorum at a meeting.

A partner not physically present in person or by proxy at a meeting of partners may by means of remote communication participate in a meeting of partners held at a designated place.

In any meeting of partners held solely by means of remote communication under subdivision a of subsection 2 or in any meeting of partners held at a designated place in which one or more partners participate by means of remote communication under subdivision b of subsection 2:

The limited partnership shall implement reasonable measures to:

Verify that each person deemed present and entitled to vote at the meeting by means of remote communication is a partner; and

Provide each partner participating by means of remote communication with a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting, including an opportunity to:

Read or hear the proceedings of the meeting substantially concurrently with those proceedings;

If allowed by the procedures governing the meeting, have the remarks of a partner heard or read by other participants in the meeting substantially concurrently with the making of those remarks; and

If otherwise entitled, vote on matters submitted to the partners.

Participation in a meeting by this means constitutes presence at the meeting in person or by proxy if all of the requirements of section 45-10.2-21 are met.

Any ballot, vote, authorization, or consent submitted by electronic communication under this chapter may be revoked by the partner submitting the ballot, vote, authorization, or consent so long as the revocation is received by a general partner of the limited partnership at or before the meeting or before an action without a meeting is effective as provided in section 45-10.2-19.

A partner may waive notice of a meeting by means of authenticated electronic communication. Participation in a meeting by means of remote communication described in subdivisions a and b of subsection 2 is a waiver of notice of that meeting, except when the partner objects:

At the beginning of the meeting to the transaction of business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened; or

Before a vote on an item of business because the item may not lawfully be considered at the meeting and does not participate in the consideration of the item at that meeting.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-21.
Consent and proxies of partners.

At or before the meeting for which the appointment is to be effective, a partner may cast or authorize the casting of a vote:

By filing with a partner or agent authorized to tabulate votes a written appointment of a proxy which is signed by the partner.

By remote communication or authenticated electronic communication to a partner or agent authorized to tabulate votes, whether or not accompanied by written instructions of the partner, of an appointment of a proxy.

The remote communication or authenticated electronic communication must set forth or be submitted with information from which it can be determined that the appointment is authorized by the partner. If it is reasonably concluded that the remote communication or authenticated electronic communication is valid, then the inspectors of election or, if there are no inspectors, then the other persons making that determination of validity shall specify the information upon which they relied to make that determination.

A proxy so appointed may vote on behalf of the partner, or otherwise participate, in a meeting by remote communication according to section 45-10.2-20 to the extent the partner appointing the proxy would have been entitled to participate by remote communication according to section 45-10.2-20 if the partner did not appoint the proxy.

A copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reproduction of the original writing or transmission may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or transmission for any purpose for which the original writing or transmission could be used if the copy, facsimile telecommunication, or other reproduction is a complete and legible reproduction of the entire original writing or transmission.

An appointment of a proxy for partnership interests held jointly by two or more partners is valid if signed or consented to by authenticated electronic communication by any one of the partners, unless the limited partnership receives from any of those partners written notice or authenticated electronic communication either denying the authority of that person to appoint a proxy or appointing a different proxy.

The appointment of a proxy is valid for eleven months, unless a longer period is expressly provided in the appointment. No appointment is irrevocable unless the appointment is coupled with an interest, including a security interest, in the partnership interests or in the limited partnership. A partner who revokes a proxy is not liable in any way for damages, restitution, or other claim.

An appointment may be revoked at will, unless the appointment is coupled with an interest, in which case it may not be revoked except in accordance with the terms of an agreement, if any, between the parties to the appointment. Appointment of a proxy is revoked by the person appointing the proxy by:

Attending a meeting and voting in person; or

Signing and delivering to the partner or to a duly authorized agent of the partnership:

A writing stating the appointment of the proxy is revoked; or

A new appointment; or

Remote communication or by authenticated electronic communication, whether or not accompanied by written instructions of the partner, of:

A statement that the proxy is revoked; or

A new appointment.

Revocation in either manner provided in subdivisions b and c of subsection 3 revokes all earlier proxy appointments and is effective:

When filed with a general partner or duly authorized agent of the limited partnership; or

When the remote communication or the authenticated electronic communication is received by a partner or by the duly authorized agent of the partnership.

The death or incapacity of a person appointing a proxy does not affect the right of the limited partnership to accept the authority of the proxy, unless written notice of the death or incapacity is received by a partner or agent authorized to tabulate votes before the proxy exercises authority under that appointment.

Unless the appointment specifically provides otherwise, if two or more persons are appointed as proxies for a partner:

Then any one of them may vote the partnership interests on each item of business in accordance with specific instructions contained in the appointment; or

If no specific instructions are contained in the appointment with respect to voting the partnership interests on a particular item of business, then the partnership interests must be voted as a majority of the proxies determine. If the proxies are equally divided, then the partnership interests may not be voted.

Subject to section 45-10.2-22 and an express restriction, limitation, or specific reservation of authority of the proxy appearing on the appointment, the limited partnership may accept a vote or action by the proxy as the action of the partner. The vote of a proxy is final, binding, and not subject to challenge. However, the proxy is liable to the partner or beneficial owner for damages resulting from a failure to exercise the proxy or from an exercise of the proxy in violation of the authority granted in the appointment.

If a proxy is given authority by a partner to vote on less than all items of business considered at a meeting of partners, then the partner is considered to be present and entitled to vote by the proxy, only with respect to those items of business for which the proxy has authority to vote. A proxy who is given authority by a partner who abstains with respect to an item of business is considered to have authority to vote on the item of business for purposes of this subsection.

The remote communication or the authenticated electronic communication must set forth or be submitted with information from which it can be determined that the revocation or the new appointment was authorized by the partner.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2009, ch. 106, § 61.

45-10.2-22.
Acceptance of partner act by the limited partnership.

If the name signed on a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment corresponds to the record name of a partner, then the limited partnership if acting in good faith may accept the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the partner.

Unless the certificate of limited partnership or partnership agreement provides otherwise, if the name signed on a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment does not correspond to the record name of a partner, then the limited partnership if acting in good faith may accept the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the partner if:

The partner is an organization and the name signed purports to be that of an officer, manager, or agent of the organization;

The name signed purports to be that of an administrator, guardian, or conservator representing the partner, and, if the limited partnership requests, evidence of fiduciary status acceptable to the limited partnership has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

The name signed purports to be that of a receiver or trustee in bankruptcy of the partner, and, if the limited partnership requests, evidence of this status acceptable to the limited partnership has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

The name signed purports to be that of a pledgee, beneficial owner, or attorney in fact of the partner, and, if the limited partnership requests, evidence acceptable to the limited partnership of the authority of the signatory to sign for the partner has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment; or

Two or more persons hold the interests as cotenants or fiduciaries and the name signed purports to be the name of at least one of the coholders and the person signing appears to be acting on behalf of all the coholders.

The limited partnership may reject a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment if the partner or agent authorized to tabulate votes, acting in good faith, has reasonable basis to doubt the validity of the signature on it or the authority of the signatory to sign for the partner.

The limited partnership or its agent who accepts or rejects a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment in good faith and in accordance with the standards of this section is not liable in damages to the partner for the consequences of the acceptance or rejection.

Action of the limited partnership based on the acceptance or rejection of a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment under this section is valid unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-23. (201)
Formation of limited partnership and certificate of limited partnership.

In order for a limited partnership to be formed, a certificate of limited partnership must be filed with the secretary of state.

The certificate must state:

The name of the limited partnership, which must comply with section 45-10.2-10;

The general character of its business;

The street address and mailing address of the principal executive office;

The name, street address, and mailing address of each general partner;

The name of the registered agent in this state as provided in chapter 10-01.1 and, if a noncommercial registered agent, the address of that noncommercial registered agent in this state; and

Any additional information required by sections 45-10.2-94 through 45-10.2-106.

A certificate of limited partnership may also contain any other matters but may not vary or otherwise affect the provisions specified in subsection 2 of section 45-10.2-12 in a manner inconsistent with that section.

A limited partnership is formed when the certificate of limited partnership is filed with the secretary of state or on the date specified in the certificate of limited partnership that is within ninety days after the filing of the certificate of limited partnership with the secretary of state.

Subject to subdivision b of subsection 1, if any provision of a partnership agreement is inconsistent with the filed certificate of limited partnership or with a filed statement of dissociation, termination, or change or filed articles of conversion or merger:

The partnership agreement prevails as to partners and transferees; and

The filed certificate of limited partnership, statement of dissociation, termination, or change or articles of conversion or merger prevail as to persons, other than partners and transferees, that reasonably rely on the filed record to their detriment.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2007, ch. 99, § 61.

Collateral References.

Liability for false information in certificate of limited partnership, under Uniform Limited Partnership Act § 6, 34 A.L.R.2d 1454.

45-10.2-24. (202)
Amendment or restatement of certificate.

In order to amend its certificate of limited partnership, a limited partnership must deliver to the secretary of state for filing an amendment or, pursuant to sections 45-10.2-100 through 45-10.2-106, articles of merger stating:

The name of the limited partnership; and

The changes the amendment makes to the certificate as most recently amended or restated.

A limited partnership shall promptly deliver to the secretary of state for filing an amendment to a certificate of limited partnership to reflect:

The change of name of the limited partnership;

The admission of a new general partner;

The dissociation of a person as a general partner; or

The appointment of a person to wind up the activities of the limited partnership under subsection 3 or 4 of section 45-10.2-68.

A general partner that knows that any information in a filed certificate of limited partnership was false when the certificate was filed or has become false due to changed circumstances shall promptly:

Cause the certificate to be amended; or

If appropriate, deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change pursuant to section 45-10.2-18 or a statement of correction pursuant to section 45-10.2-28.

A certificate of limited partnership may be amended at any time for any other proper purpose as determined by the limited partnership.

A restated certificate of limited partnership may be delivered to the secretary of state for filing in the same manner as an amendment.

Subject to subsection 3 of section 45-10.2-27, an amendment or restated certificate is effective when filed by the secretary of state or on a date specified in the amendment or restated certificate that is within ninety days after the filing of the amendment or restated certificate with the secretary of state.

A limited partnership shall submit a written report of any change of address of the principal executive office to the secretary of state without a filing fee or report the change of address on the annual report following the change and need not file an amendment to a certificate of limited partnership.

A limited partnership that files an amendment to change its name and which is the owner of a service mark, trademark, or trade name, is a general partner named in a fictitious name certificate, is a general partner in another limited partnership or limited liability limited partnership, or is a managing partner in a limited liability partnership that is on file with the secretary of state shall change the name of the limited partnership in each of the foregoing registrations that is applicable when the limited partnership files an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2009, ch. 106, § 62; 2015, ch. 86, § 17, effective July 1, 2015.

45-10.2-25.
(204) Signing of records.

Each record delivered to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to this chapter must be signed in the following manner:

An initial certificate of limited partnership must be signed by all general partners listed in the certificate.

An amendment to the certificate of limited partnership converting the limited partnership to a limited liability limited partnership must be signed by all general partners listed in the certificate.

An amendment to the certificate of limited partnership designating as general partner a person admitted under subdivision b of subsection 3 of section 45-10.2-66 following the dissociation of a last general partner of a limited partnership must be signed by that person.

An amendment to the certificate of limited partnership required by subsection 3 of section 45-10.2-68 following the appointment of a person to wind up the activities of the dissolved limited partnership must be signed by that person.

Any other amendment to the certificate of limited partnership must be signed by:

At least one general partner listed in the certificate;

Each other person designated in the amendment as a new general partner; and

Each person that the amendment indicates has dissociated as a general partner, unless:

The person is deceased or a guardian or general conservator has been appointed for the person and the amendment so states;

The dissociated person has not been requested by the limited partnership to sign an amendment and the amendment so states; or

The person has previously delivered to the secretary of state for filing a statement of dissociation.

A restated certificate of limited partnership must be signed by at least one general partner listed in the certificate, and, to the extent the restated certificate effects a change under any other subdivision of this subsection, the certificate must be signed in a manner that satisfies that subdivision.

A statement of termination must be signed by a majority in interest of the general partners listed in the certificate of limited partnership or, if the certificate of a dissolved limited partnership lists no general partners, then by the person appointed pursuant to subsection 3 or 4 of section 45-10.2-68 to wind up the activities of the dissolved limited partnership.

Articles of conversion must be signed by all of the general partners listed in the certificate of limited partnership.

Articles of merger must be signed as provided in subsection 1 of section 45-10.2-102.

Any other record delivered on behalf of a limited partnership to the secretary of state for filing must be signed by at least one general partner listed in the certificate of limited partnership.

A statement by a person pursuant to subdivision d of subsection 1 of section 45-10.2-59 stating that the person has dissociated as a general partner must be signed by that person.

A statement of withdrawal by a person pursuant to section 45-10.2-36 must be signed by that person.

A record delivered on behalf of a foreign limited partnership to the secretary of state for filing must be signed by at least one general partner of the foreign limited partnership.

Any other record delivered on behalf of any person to the secretary of state for filing must be signed by that person.

Any person may sign by an attorney in fact any record to be filed pursuant to this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2015, ch. 86, § 18, effective July 1, 2015.

45-10.2-26. (205)
Signing and filing pursuant to judicial order.

If a person required by this chapter to sign a record or deliver a record to the secretary of state for filing does not do so, then any other person that is aggrieved may petition the district court to order:

The person to sign the record and deliver the record to the secretary of state for filing; or

The secretary of state to file the record unsigned.

If the person aggrieved under subsection 1 is not the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership to which the record pertains, then the aggrieved person shall make the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership a party to the action. A person aggrieved under subsection 1 may seek the remedies provided in subsection 1 in the same action in combination or in the alternative.

A record filed unsigned pursuant to this section is effective without being signed.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-27. (206)
Delivery to and filing of records by secretary of state and effective date.

A record authorized or required to be delivered to the secretary of state for filing under this chapter must be captioned to describe the purpose of the record, be in a medium permitted by the secretary of state, and be delivered to the secretary of state. If the secretary of state determines that a record complies with the filing requirements of this chapter, then the secretary of state shall file the record and, except for an annual report, return a copy of the filed record to the person that delivered it to the secretary of state for filing. That person shall then:

For a statement of dissociation, send a copy of the filed statement:

To the person which the statement indicates has dissociated as a general partner; and

To the limited partnership;

For a statement of withdrawal, send a copy of the filed statement:

To the person on whose behalf the record was filed; and

If the statement refers to an existing limited partnership, to the limited partnership; and

For all other records, send a copy of the filed record to the person on whose behalf the record was filed.

Upon request and payment of a fee provided in section 45-10.2-109, the secretary of state shall send to the requester a certified copy of the requested record.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 45-10.2-18 and 45-10.2-28, a record delivered to the secretary of state for filing under this chapter may specify a delayed effective date within ninety days. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a record filed by the secretary of state is effective:

If the record does not specify a delayed effective date within ninety days, then on the date the record is filed as evidenced by the endorsement of the secretary of state of the date on the record.

If the record specifies a delayed effective date within ninety days, then on the specified date.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2007, ch. 101, § 70.

45-10.2-28.
Correcting a filed record.

With respect to correction of a filed record:

Whenever a record authorized by this chapter to be filed with the secretary of state has been filed and inaccurately records the action referred to in the record, contains an inaccurate or erroneous statement, or was defectively or erroneously signed, sealed, acknowledged, or verified, the record may be corrected by filing a statement of correction.

A statement of correction:

Must:

Be signed by:

The person that signed the original record; or

By a person authorized to sign on behalf of that person;

Set forth the name of the limited partnership that filed the record;

Identify the record to be corrected by description and by the date of its filing with the secretary of state;

Identify the inaccuracy, error, or defect to be corrected; and

Set forth a statement in corrected form of the portion of the record to be corrected.

May not revoke or nullify the record.

The statement of correction must be filed with the secretary of state.

With respect to the effective date of correction:

A certificate issued by the secretary of state before a record is corrected, with respect to the effect of filing the original record, is considered to be applicable to the record as corrected as of the date the record as corrected is considered to have been filed under this subsection.

After a statement of correction has been filed with the secretary of state, the original record as corrected is considered to have been filed:

On the date the statement of correction was filed:

As to persons adversely affected by the correction; and

For the purposes of subsections 3 and 4 of section 45-10.2-06; and

On the date the original record was filed as to all other persons and for all other purposes.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-29. (208)
Liability for false information in filed record.

If a record delivered to the secretary of state for filing under this chapter and filed by the secretary of state contains false information, then a person that suffers loss by reliance on the information may recover damages for the loss from:

A person that signed the record, or caused another to sign it on behalf of a person, and knew the information to be false at the time the record was signed; and

A general partner that has notice that the information was false when the record was filed or has become false because of changed circumstances, if the general partner has notice for a reasonably sufficient time before the information is relied upon to enable the general partner to effect an amendment under section 45-10.2-24, file a petition pursuant to section 45-10.2-26, or deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change pursuant to section 45-10.2-18 or a statement of correction pursuant to section 45-10.2-28.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

Collateral References.

Liability for false information in certificate of limited partnership, under Uniform Limited Partnership Act § 6, 34 A.L.R.2d 1454.

45-10.2-30. (209)
Certificate of existence or authorization.

The secretary of state, upon request and payment of the fee provided in section 45-10.2-109, shall furnish a certificate of existence for a limited partnership if the records filed in the office of the secretary of state show that the secretary of state has filed a certificate of limited partnership and has not filed a statement of termination. A certificate of existence must state:

The name of the limited partnership;

That it was duly formed under the laws of this state and date of formation; and

Whether all fees and penalties due to the secretary of state under this chapter have been paid.

The secretary of state, upon request and payment of the fee provided in section 45-10.2-109, shall furnish a certificate of authorization for a foreign limited partnership if the records filed in the office of the secretary of state show that the secretary of state has filed a certificate of authority, has not revoked the certificate of authority, and has not filed a notice of cancellation. A certificate of authorization must state:

The name of the foreign limited partnership;

That it is authorized to transact business in this state; and

Whether all fees and penalties due to the secretary of state under this chapter have been paid.

Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate of existence or authorization issued by the secretary of state may be relied upon as conclusive evidence that the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership is in existence or is authorized to transact business in this state.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-31. (301)
Becoming a limited partner.

A person becomes a limited partner:

As provided in the partnership agreement;

As the result of a conversion or merger under sections 45-10.2-94 through 45-10.2-106; or

With the consent of all of the partners.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-32. (302)
No right or power as limited partner to bind limited partnership.

A limited partner does not have the right or the power as a limited partner to act for or bind the limited partnership.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-33. (303)
No liability as limited partner for limited partnership obligation.

An obligation of a limited partnership, whether arising in contract, tort, or otherwise, is not the obligation of a limited partner. A limited partner is not personally liable, directly or indirectly, by way of contribution or otherwise, for an obligation of the limited partnership solely by reason of being a limited partner, even if the limited partner participates in the management and control of the limited partnership.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

Collateral References.

Liability of limited partner arising from taking part in control of business under uniform limited partnership act, 79 A.L.R.4th 427.

45-10.2-34. (304)
Right of limited partner and former limited partner to information.

On ten days’ demand, made in a record received by the limited partnership, a limited partner may inspect and copy required information during regular business hours in the principal executive office of the limited partnership. The limited partner need not have any particular purpose for seeking the information.

During regular business hours and at a reasonable location specified by the limited partnership, a limited partner may obtain from the limited partnership and inspect and copy true and full information regarding the state of the activities and financial condition of the limited partnership and other information regarding the activities of the limited partnership as is just and reasonable if:

The limited partner seeks the information for a purpose reasonably related to an interest as a limited partner;

The limited partner makes a demand in a record received by the limited partnership, describing with reasonable particularity the information sought and the purpose for seeking the information; and

The information sought is directly connected to the purpose of the limited partner.

Within ten days after receiving a demand pursuant to subsection 2, the limited partnership in a record shall inform the limited partner that made the demand:

What information the limited partnership will provide in response to the demand;

When and where the limited partnership will provide the information; and

If the limited partnership declines to provide any demanded information, the reasons of the limited partnership for declining.

Subject to subsection 6, a person dissociated as a limited partner may inspect and copy required information during regular business hours in the designated office of the limited partnership if:

The information pertains to the period during which the person was a limited partner;

The person seeks the information in good faith; and

The person meets the requirements of subsection 2.

The limited partnership shall respond to a demand made pursuant to subsection 4 in the same manner as provided in subsection 3.

If a limited partner dies, then section 45-10.2-65 applies.

The limited partnership may impose reasonable restrictions on the use of information obtained under this section. In a dispute concerning the reasonableness of a restriction under this subsection, the limited partnership has the burden of proving reasonableness.

A limited partnership may charge a person that makes a demand under this section reasonable costs of copying, limited to the costs of labor and material.

Whenever this chapter or a partnership agreement provides for a limited partner to give or withhold consent to a matter, before the consent is given or withheld, the limited partnership shall, without demand, provide the limited partner with all information material to the decision of the limited partner that the limited partnership knows.

A limited partner or person dissociated as a limited partner may exercise the rights under this section through an attorney or other agent. Any restriction imposed under subsection 7 or by the partnership agreement applies both to the attorney or other agent and to the limited partner or person dissociated as a limited partner.

The rights stated in this section do not extend to a person as transferee, but may be exercised by the legal representative of an individual under legal disability who is a limited partner or person dissociated as a limited partner.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-35. (305)
Limited duties of limited partners.

A limited partner does not have any fiduciary duty to the limited partnership or to any other partner solely by reason of being a limited partner.

A limited partner shall discharge the duties to the partnership and the other partners under this chapter or under the partnership agreement and exercise any rights consistently with the obligation of good faith and fair dealing.

A limited partner does not violate a duty or obligation under this chapter or under the partnership agreement merely because the conduct of the limited partner furthers the interest of that limited partner.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.